Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-174
Registered sex offender; release or termination of supervision; notice required; county attorney; duties.

(1) At least ninety days prior to the release from incarceration or civil commitment or the termination of probation or parole supervision of an individual who is required to register under section 29-4003, the agency with jurisdiction over the individual shall provide notice to the Attorney General, the Nebraska State Patrol, the prosecuting county attorney, and the county attorney in the county in which an individual is incarcerated, supervised, or committed.

(2) The Board of Parole shall also provide notice to the Attorney General, the Nebraska State Patrol, the prosecuting county attorney, and the county attorney in the county in which such individual is incarcerated or committed within five days after scheduling a parole hearing for an individual who is required to register under section 29-4003.

(3) A county attorney shall, no later than forty-five days after receiving notice of the pending release of an individual pursuant to this section, notify the Attorney General whether the county attorney intends to initiate civil commitment proceedings against such individual upon his or her release from custody.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 86.